Maine, session 132, LD1422.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §1, sub-§14-A is enacted to read:
14-A. Elections determined by ranked-choice voting. "Elections determined by
ranked-choice voting" means any of the following elections in which 3 or more candidates
have qualified to be listed on the ballot for a particular office or at least 2 such candidates
plus one or more declared write‑in candidates have qualified for that particular office:
A. Open primary elections for the offices of United States Senator, United States
Representative to Congress, Governor, State Senator and State Representative; and
B. General elections for presidential electors and for the offices of United States
Senator and United States Representative to Congress.
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §1, sub-§14-B is enacted to read:
14-B. Elections subject to open primary. "Elections subject to an open primary"
means the elections for the offices of United States Senator, United States Representative
to Congress, Governor, State Senator and State Representative.
Sec. 3. 21-A MRSA §1, sub-§27-C, as repealed and replaced by PL 2021, c. 273,
§1, is repealed.
Sec. 4. 21-A MRSA §1, sub-§27-E is enacted to read:
27-E. Open primary election. "Open primary election" means, in elections subject
to an open primary, the regular election for the election of 2 candidates for the office of
Governor, State Senator or State Representative or 4 candidates for the office of United
States Senator or United States Representative to Congress, regardless of enrollment status,
who will appear on the ballot for the general election.
Sec. 5. 21-A MRSA §1, sub-§32, as amended by PL 1987, c. 423, §1, is further
amended to read:
32. Primary election. "Primary election" means the regular election for the election
of nominees of a party for the general election or, for an election subject to an open primary,
"primary election" means the open primary election.
Sec. 6. 21-A MRSA §1, sub-§35-A, as enacted by IB 2015, c. 3, §2, is amended
to read:
35-A. Ranked-choice voting. "Ranked-choice voting" means the method of casting
and tabulating votes in which voters rank candidates in order of preference, tabulation
proceeds in sequential rounds in which last-place candidates are defeated and the candidate
with the most votes in the final round is elected or, in an open primary election for the
office of Governor, State Senator or State Representative, the 2 candidates with the most
votes in the final round are nominated to appear on the ballot for the general election or, in
an open primary election for the office of United States Senator or United States
Representative to Congress, the 4 candidates with the most votes in the final round are
nominated to appear on the ballot for the general election.
Sec. 7. 21-A MRSA §144, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2005, c. 453, §27, is further
amended to read:
Page 1 - 132LR1234(01)

2. Party designation removed. On receipt of the application, the registrar shall
remove the party designation of the applicant from the central voter registration system.
The registrar shall indicate in the central voter registration system that the applicant is
ineligible to vote at a caucus or primary election, other than an open primary election, for
15 days by designating the party enrollment field with the letter "X." Fifteen days after
receiving the application, the registrar shall enroll the applicant in the party requested and
enter the new party designation in the party enrollment field.
This subsection does not apply in the case of a voter who changes enrollment under
subsection 4.
Sec. 8. 21-A MRSA §144, sub-§3, as repealed and replaced by PL 2013, c. 457,
§2, is amended to read:
3. Restrictions during change of enrollment. Except as provided in subsection 4, a
voter may not vote at a caucus, convention or primary election, other than an open primary
election, for 15 days after filing an application to change enrollment. A voter may sign a
primary nomination petition during the 15-day period after filing an application to change
enrollment, and the voter’s signature must be counted as valid, as long as the 15-day period
has elapsed by the time the petition is certified pursuant to section 335, subsection 7 and
the voter otherwise is qualified to sign a petition for that office. Notwithstanding
subsection 4, a voter must file an application to change enrollment prior to January 1st to
be eligible to file a petition as a candidate in that election year.
Sec. 9. 21-A MRSA §334, as amended by PL 2009, c. 253, §16, is further amended
to read:
§334. Qualification of candidate for primary nomination
A Except as provided in section 451 for an open primary election, a candidate for
nomination by primary election must file a primary petition and consent under sections 335
and 336. The candidate must be enrolled, on or before March 15th, in the party named in
the petition and must be eligible to file a petition as a candidate for nomination by primary
election under section 144, subsection 3. The registrar in the candidate's municipality of
residence must certify to that fact on a form designed by the Secretary of State.
Sec. 10. 21-A MRSA §336, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2011, c. 239, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Consent. The consent must contain a statement signed by the candidate that the
candidate will accept the nomination of the primary election, except that the consent signed
by a candidate in an open primary election must contain a statement that the candidate
agrees to have the candidate's name placed on the general election ballot if the candidate is
declared the winner of the open primary election pursuant to section 723, subsection 1-A.
The Secretary of State shall provide a form on which the consent of the candidate is made
that must include a list of the statutory and constitutional requirements of the office sought
by the candidate. The statement may be printed as a part of the primary petition.
Sec. 11. 21-A MRSA §338, as corrected by RR 2019, c. 2, Pt. B, §44, is amended
to read:
§338. Write-in candidates
Page 2 - 132LR1234(01)

A Except as provided in section 452 for an open primary election, a person whose name
will not appear on the printed primary ballot because that person did not file a petition and
consent under sections 335 and 336, but who fulfills the other qualifications under section
334, may be nominated at the primary election as a write-in candidate in accordance with
section 723, subsection 1.
Sec. 12. 21-A MRSA §339, as enacted by PL 1985, c. 161, §6, is amended to read:
§339. Time and nature of election
The Except as provided in this section, the primary election shall must be held on the
2nd Tuesday of June of each general election year and, unlike in an open primary election,
is considered to be a separate election for each party which that takes part in it. This
includes the duties of public officials in announcing the election, providing forms and
ballots, keeping records and any other matter necessary to effect the purpose of a primary
election. A primary election shall must be conducted in the same manner as the general
election, as nearly as practicable, for each party.
Sec. 13. 21-A MRSA §351, first ¶, as enacted by PL 1985, c. 161, §6, is amended
to read:
The Except as provided in subchapter 9, the nomination of a candidate, other than by
a party, for any federal, state or county office must be made by petition, as provided in this
subchapter.
Sec. 14. 21-A MRSA §351, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Elections subject to an open primary. A person who satisfies the requirements of
section 353 may file a nomination petition pursuant to this subchapter as a candidate for
the open primary election in an election subject to an open primary. A person may not file
a nomination petition pursuant to this subchapter as a candidate for the general election in
an election subject to an open primary.
Sec. 15. 21-A MRSA §354, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 389, §3, is further
amended to read:
1. Content. A nomination petition must contain the name of only one candidate, the
candidate's municipality of residence, the office sought and electoral division. A
nomination petition may contain as many separate papers as necessary and may contain the
candidate's consent required by section 355. It may also contain the candidate's political
designation. This designation may not exceed 3 words in length, may not incorporate the
candidate's name or the designation or an abbreviation of the designation of a party that is
qualified to nominate candidates by participate in a primary election and may not consist
of or comprise language that is obscene, contemptuous, profane or prejudicial, promotes
abusive or unlawful activity or violates any other provision of the laws of this State with
respect to names. A candidate who intends to form a new party about that person's
candidacy must use the proposed party's designation.
A. When 2 United States Senators are to be nominated, the nomination petition must
contain the term of office sought by the candidate.
B. The names of presidential electors must be placed on the petition as a slate. The
names of the candidates for President and Vice President must be placed on a petition
for the nomination of presidential electors.
Page 3 - 132LR1234(01)

Sec. 16. 21-A MRSA §354, sub-§7, ¶B, as amended by PL 2013, c. 131, §12, is
further amended to read:
B. Petitions Except for petitions for nomination in an open primary election, petitions
must be delivered to the registrar, or clerk at the request or upon the absence of the
registrar, for certification by 5 p.m. on May 25th in the election year in which the
petitions are to be used, except that petitions for a slate of candidates for the office of
presidential elector must be delivered for certification by 5 p.m. on July 25th in the
election year in which the petitions are to be used.
Sec. 17. 21-A MRSA §354, sub-§8-A, as amended by PL 2013, c. 131, §13, is
further amended to read:
8-A. Filed with the Secretary of State. A nomination petition must be filed in the
office of the Secretary of State by 5 p.m. on June 1st in the election year in which it is to
be used, except that petitions a nomination petition for a candidate for an open primary
election must be filed in the office of the Secretary of State by 5 p.m. on March 15th of the
election year in which it is to be used and a petition for a slate of candidates for the office
of presidential elector must be filed in the office of the Secretary of State by 5 p.m. on
August 1st in the election year in which the petitions are petition is to be used.
Sec. 18. 21-A MRSA §355, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2011, c. 534, §12, is further
amended to read:
1. Consent. The consent must contain a statement signed by the candidate that the
candidate will accept the nomination of the general election, except that the consent signed
by a candidate in an open primary election must contain a statement that the candidate
agrees to have the candidate's name placed on the general election ballot if the candidate is
declared the winner of the open primary election pursuant to section 723, subsection 1-A.
The Secretary of State shall provide a form on which the consent of the candidate is made
that must include a list of the statutory and constitutional requirements of the office sought
by the candidate. The statement may be printed as a part of the nomination petition.
Sec. 19. 21-A MRSA §361, first ¶, as corrected by RR 2019, c. 2, Pt. B, §48, is
amended to read:
A vacancy in any federal, state or county office, in the office of an election official or
in any political committee occurs when the incumbent dies, resigns, becomes disqualified
or changes the incumbent's residence to an electoral division other than that from which
the incumbent was elected or when the person elected fails to qualify. A vacancy in the
office of United States Senator, United States Representative to Congress, Governor, State
Senator or State Representative also occurs at the beginning of the term of office for a
candidate who was elected at a general election for that office but who died or became
disqualified on or before the date of that general election.
Sec. 20. 21-A MRSA §367, as amended by PL 2023, c. 304, Pt. A, §8, is further
amended to read:
§367. Candidate withdrawal
A Except as provided in section 374-A, subsection 4, a candidate who wishes to
withdraw from an elective race shall notify the Secretary of State in writing of the
candidate's intent to withdraw. This notice must be signed by the candidate and submitted
Page 4 - 132LR1234(01)

414 to the Secretary of State by the appropriate deadline provided in article 2. The notice may
425 be submitted by facsimile or scanned image.
Sec. 21. 21-A MRSA §371, as repealed and replaced by PL 2019, c. 636, §6, is
amended to read:
§371. Primary election candidates; vacancy
3. Vacancy and replacement of candidates in uncontested races party primaries.
If For a primary election other than an open primary election, if a candidate for nomination
dies or becomes disqualified prior to the primary election or withdraws 70 days or more
before the primary election, the Secretary of State shall declare the vacancy pursuant to
section 362‑A if no other candidate from the same political party will appear on the primary
election ballot for that office. A political committee may fill the vacancy pursuant to
section 363. The Secretary of State shall remove the former candidate's name from the
primary election ballot and shall produce new primary election ballots or amend or
supplement the primary election ballots already printed in accordance with section 376 or
604.
4. Removal of candidate's name from ballot in contested races party primaries.
The For a primary election other than an open primary election, the Secretary of State shall
remove the name of a candidate for nomination from the primary election ballot but is not
required to declare a vacancy if, 70 days or more before the primary election, the candidate
dies, becomes disqualified or withdraws and another candidate from the same political
party will appear on the ballot for that office.
5. Death or disqualification of candidates less than 70 days before primary
election in contested races party primaries. The For a primary election other than an
open primary election, the Secretary of State is not required to remove the name of a
candidate from the primary election ballot or declare a vacancy if a candidate dies or
becomes disqualified less than 70 days before the primary election and another candidate
from the same political party will appear on the ballot for that office. Upon receipt of
information that the candidate has died or become disqualified, the Secretary of State shall
immediately prepare and distribute to the local election officials in the candidate's electoral
district a notice informing voters that the candidate has died or become disqualified and
that a vote for that candidate will not be counted. The notice must be distributed with all
absentee ballots requested after the notice is received by the local election officials and, on
election day, must be posted outside the guardrail enclosure in accordance with section
651, subsection 2 and in each voting booth. Notice that the candidate has died or become
disqualified must also be posted on the Secretary of State's publicly accessible website.
6. Withdrawal of candidates less than 70 days before primary election in
contested and uncontested races party primaries. When For a primary election other
than an open primary election, when a candidate for nomination withdraws less than 70
days before the primary election, the candidate's name may not be removed from the
primary election ballot and a vacancy may not be declared. Upon receipt of the notice of
withdrawal, the Secretary of State shall immediately prepare and distribute to the local
election officials in the candidate's electoral district a notice informing voters that the
candidate has withdrawn and that a vote for that candidate will not be counted. The notice
must be distributed with all absentee ballots requested after the notice is received by the
local election officials and, on election day, must be posted outside the guardrail enclosure
Page 5 - 132LR1234(01)

416 in accordance with section 651, subsection 2 and in each voting booth. Notice of the late
427 withdrawal must also be posted on the Secretary of State's publicly accessible website.
7. Removal of candidate's name from ballot in open primary elections. The
Secretary of State shall remove the name of a candidate from the primary election ballot
but is not required to declare a vacancy if, 70 days or more before an open primary election,
the candidate dies, becomes disqualified or withdraws.
8. Withdrawal, death or disqualification of candidates less than 70 days before
open primary election. When a candidate for an open primary election dies, becomes
disqualified or withdraws less than 70 days before the open primary election, the
candidate's name may not be removed from the open primary election ballot and a vacancy
may not be declared. Upon receipt of information that the candidate has died or become
disqualified or upon receipt of the notice of withdrawal, the Secretary of State shall
immediately prepare and distribute to the local election officials in the candidate's electoral
district a notice informing voters that the candidate has died, become disqualified or
withdrawn and that a vote for that candidate will not be counted. The notice must be
distributed with all absentee ballots requested after the notice is received by the local
election officials and, on election day, must be posted outside the guardrail enclosure in
accordance with section 651, subsection 2 and in each voting booth. Notice that a candidate
has died or become disqualified and notice of a late withdrawal must also be posted on the
Secretary of State's publicly accessible website.
Sec. 22. 21-A MRSA §374-A, as amended by PL 2019, c. 636, §9, is further
amended to read:
§374-A. General election candidates; vacancy
1. Vacancy and replacement of nominees in elections not subject to open primary.
The In an election other than an election subject to an open primary, the Secretary of State
shall declare the vacancy as provided in section 362‑A and a political committee may make
a replacement nomination for the general election only if a person nominated for an office
at a primary election or by a political committee:
A. Withdraws on or before 5 p.m. of the 2nd Monday in July preceding the general
election in accordance with section 367;
B. Withdraws because of a catastrophic illness, condition or injury that has
permanently and continuously incapacitated the candidate and would prevent
performance of the duties of the office sought, as long as the candidate or a member of
the candidate's immediate family files with the Secretary of State a certificate
accompanying the withdrawal request that describes the illness, condition or injury and
is signed by a licensed physician; or
C. Dies prior to the general election.
2. Deadline for replacement of nominee in elections not subject to open primary.
A In an election other than an election subject to an open primary, a political committee
may make a replacement nomination for the general election:
A. No later than 5 p.m. of the 4th Monday in July preceding the general election for a
candidate who has withdrawn in accordance with subsection 1, paragraph A; or
Page 6 - 132LR1234(01)

B. As soon as practicable for a candidate who withdraws or is withdrawn in accordance
with subsection 1, paragraph B or C.
2-A. Ballot procedure for replacement candidates in elections not subject to open
primary. If In an election other than an election subject to an open primary, if a political
party makes a replacement nomination for the general election by the deadline established
in subsection 2, the Secretary of State shall produce new general election ballots or amend
or supplement general election ballots already printed in accordance with section 376 or
604.
3. Deadline for removal of candidate's name from general election ballot in
elections not subject to open primary. The name of a candidate for an office on the
general election ballot who withdraws for any reason 70 days or more before the general
election must be removed from the ballot. If a candidate for an office on the general
election ballot withdraws less than 70 days before the general election and meets the criteria
of subsection 1, paragraph B or C, the candidate's name must be removed from the general
election ballot in accordance with section 376 or the general election ballot must be
amended or supplemented in accordance with section 604. If a candidate for an office on
the general election ballot withdraws less than 70 days before the general election and does
not meet the criteria of subsection 1, paragraph B or C, the candidate's name will not be
removed from the ballot, but upon receipt of the notice of withdrawal required by section
367, the Secretary of State shall immediately prepare and distribute to the local election
officials in the candidate's electoral district a notice informing voters that the candidate has
withdrawn and that a vote for that candidate will not be counted. The notice must be
distributed with all absentee ballots requested after the notice is received by the local
election officials and, on election day, must be posted outside the guardrail enclosure in
accordance with section 651, subsection 2 and in each voting booth. Notice of a candidate's
withdrawal less than 70 days before the general election must also be posted on the
Secretary of State's publicly accessible website. This subsection does not apply to an
election subject to an open primary.
4. Withdrawal of open primary winner prohibited. A candidate who is declared
the winner of an open primary election pursuant to section 723, subsection 1-A may not
withdraw from the general election.
5. Death or disqualification of nominees in elections subject to open primary. If
a candidate who is declared the winner of an open primary election pursuant to section 723,
subsection 1-A dies or becomes disqualified at any time before the general election, the
candidate's name will not be removed from the ballot. Upon receipt of information that the
candidate has died or become disqualified, the Secretary of State shall immediately prepare
and distribute to local election officials in the candidate's electoral district and on the
Secretary of State's publicly accessible website a notice informing voters that, although the
candidate has died or become disqualified, a vote for that candidate will be counted and, if
the candidate is declared the winner of the election, a vacancy will be declared at the
beginning of the term for which the candidate was elected. The notice must be distributed
with all absentee ballots requested after the notice is received by the local election officials
and, on election day, must be posted outside the guardrail enclosure in accordance with
section 651, subsection 2 and in each voting booth.
Page 7 - 132LR1234(01)

Sec. 23. 21-A MRSA §376, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 636, §11, is
amended to read:
1-A. Removal of candidate's name from ballots. The Except as provided in section
374-A, subsection 4, the Secretary of State shall remove a candidate's name from the ballot
if the candidate withdraws for any reason 70 days or more before any primary or general
election.
Sec. 24. 21-A MRSA §441, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 273, §7, is further
amended to read:
1. Determination of primary. No later than October November 1st of the year prior
to a presidential election year, the state committee of each party shall certify whether there
is a contest among candidates for nomination as the presidential candidate. Upon receiving
the certification from one or more parties, the Secretary of State shall announce the parties
that will have a presidential primary election, which must be held on the first 2nd Tuesday
after the first Monday in March of June of the presidential election year.
Sec. 25. 21-A MRSA c. 5, sub-c. 9 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 9
OPEN PRIMARY ELECTIONS
§451. Qualification of candidate for open primary election; same ballot
Notwithstanding any provision of this Title to the contrary, the names of all qualified
candidates for an election subject to an open primary must appear on the same ballot for
the open primary election. A candidate is qualified to appear on the open primary ballot if
the candidate:
1. Candidate enrolled in a party. Is enrolled in a party qualified to participate in a
primary election under section 301, 302 or 303; enrolled in that party on or before March
15th of the election year; and filed a primary petition and consent that meets the
requirements of sections 335 and 336, subject to challenge and appeal under section 337.
The party designation of a candidate who meets the requirements of this subsection must
be printed on the open primary election ballot; or
2. Unenrolled candidates. Is not enrolled in a party qualified to participate in a
primary election; filed a nomination petition and consent that meets the requirements of
sections 351, 354 and 355, subject to challenge and appeal under section 356; and was
certified by the Secretary of State pursuant to section 357. The party designation, if any,
of a candidate who meets the requirements of this subsection may not be printed on the
open primary election ballot.
§452. Declared write-in candidates
Notwithstanding any provision of this Title to the contrary, a person who does not
qualify to be listed on the open primary election ballot pursuant to section 451 but who
qualifies as a declared write-in candidate pursuant to section 722-A may be nominated as
a write-in candidate in an open primary election.
§453. Voter at open primary election
Page 8 - 132LR1234(01)

Notwithstanding any provision of this Title to the contrary, a voter qualified to vote in
the general election for the office of United States Senator, United States Representative to
Congress, Governor, State Senator or State Representative may vote in the open primary
election for that office regardless of the voter's enrollment status.
Sec. 26. 21-A MRSA §601, sub-§2, ¶D, as amended by PL 2009, c. 253, §24, is
further amended to read:
D. At the end of the list of candidates for each office, there must be left as many blank
spaces as there are vacancies to be filled, except that no blank spaces may be placed at
the end of the list of nominees for the office on the general election ballot for an election
subject to an open primary. These The blank spaces left on the ballot under this
paragraph may be used by a voter to write in the name of a person for whom the voter
desires to vote, as provided in section 691, subsection 2 for a primary election or section
692, subsection 2 for a general election.
Sec. 27. 21-A MRSA §601, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2001, c. 310, §29, is further
amended to read:
4. Distinctively colored Distinct color. When possible, election ballots must be
printed on white paper. Each political party participating in a primary election other than
an open primary election must have a separate ballot. The paper for each party's primary
ballot must be printed or distinguished with a different color marking as determined by the
Secretary of State. For municipalities that include more than one single member district of
the State Senate or the House of Representatives, or parts of more than one single member
district, the Secretary of State may prepare ballots with one or more distinctive color
markings for each single member district or part of a single member district within the
municipality.
Sec. 28. 21-A MRSA §651, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 636, §13, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (3-A) to read:
(3-A) A supplemental notice correcting an error or providing information on a
replacement candidate prepared under section 604 or; a notice informing voters
that a vote for a candidate will not be counted because the candidate has died or
has withdrawn prepared under section 371, subsection 5 or 6 or section 374‑A,
subsection 3; or a notice informing voters that, although a candidate has died or
become disqualified, a vote for that candidate will be counted and, if that candidate
is declared the winner of the election, a vacancy will be declared at the beginning
of the term of the office for which the candidate was elected, prepared under
section 374-A, subsection 5, next to the sample ballots;
Sec. 29. 21-A MRSA §673, sub-§1, ¶A, as corrected by RR 2011, c. 2, §21, is
amended by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
(2) Is not enrolled in the proper party, if voting in a primary election other than an
open primary election;
Sec. 30. 21-A MRSA §692, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 304, Pt. A, §11, is
further amended to read:
2. Write-in vote. If the voter wishes to vote for a write-in candidate, the voter must
write the name of the candidate in the blank space provided next to the write-in indicator.
Page 9 - 132LR1234(01)

414 The voter must then mark the write-in indicator as instructed on the ballot to indicate a vote
425 for the write-in candidate. A sticker may not be used to vote for a write-in candidate. A
436 voter may not vote for a write-in candidate in a general election in an election subject to an
447 open primary.
Sec. 31. 21-A MRSA §696, sub-§2, ¶E-1 is enacted to read:
E-1. If a voter marks the write-in indicator on a general election ballot for an election
subject to an open primary, the vote for that office may not be counted.
Sec. 32. 21-A MRSA §722, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2019, c. 371, §26, is
further amended to read:
1-A. Form of tabulation. The tabulation must include the total votes for each question
choice or candidate whose name appeared on the ballot. The tabulation also must include
the total votes for any declared write-in candidates pursuant to section 722-A as follows.
A. For a write-in candidate who receives 5% or more of the votes cast for that office,
the Secretary of State shall report the votes under the candidate's name.
B. For a write-in candidate who receives less than 5% of the votes cast for that office,
the Secretary of State shall report the votes under the designation "others."
Sec. 33. 21-A MRSA §722-A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 304, Pt. A, §13, is further
amended to read:
§722-A. Determination of declared write-in candidate
To be considered a declared write-in candidate, a person must file a declaration of
write-in candidacy with the Secretary of State, on a form approved by the Secretary of
State, on or before 5 p.m. on the 70th day prior to the election. The candidate must meet
all the other qualifications for that office. A person may not be a declared write-in
candidate for the general election in an election subject to an open primary.
Sec. 34. 21-A MRSA §723, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2019, c. 320, §8, is further
amended to read:
1. Primary election. In a primary election other than an open primary election, the
person who receives a plurality of the votes cast for nomination to any office, as long as
there is at least one vote cast for that office, is nominated for that office, except for write-
in candidates under paragraph A and elections determined by ranked‑choice voting under
section 723‑A.
A. A write-in candidate who complies with section 722‑A and who fulfills the other
qualifications under section 334 may be nominated at the primary election if that person
receives a number of valid write-in votes equal to at least twice the minimum number
of signatures required under section 335, subsection 5 on a primary petition for a
candidate for that office.
B. The Secretary of State shall immediately certify by mail the nomination of each
person nominated by the primary election.
Sec. 35. 21-A MRSA §723, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Open primary election. In an open primary election for the office of Governor,
State Senator or State Representative, the 2 persons who receive the most votes cast as
Page 10 - 132LR1234(01)

412 determined by section 723-A must be declared the winners of the open primary election
423 and are nominated to be placed on the general election ballot for that office. In an open
434 primary election for the office of United States Senator or United States Representative to
445 Congress, the 4 persons who receive the most votes cast as determined by section 723-A
456 must be declared the winners of the open primary election and placed on the general
467 election ballot for that office. The Secretary of State shall immediately certify by mail the
478 nomination of each person to be placed on the general election ballot pursuant to this
489 subsection.
Sec. 36. 21-A MRSA §723, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. General election following open primary election. In a general election for the
office of Governor, State Senator or State Representative, the nominee who receives a
plurality of the votes cast for that office, as long as there is at least one vote cast for that
office, is elected to that office. A write-in candidate may not be elected in a general election
in an election subject to an open primary.
Sec. 37. 21-A MRSA §723, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2017, c. 316, §7, is further
amended to read:
2. Other elections. In any other election not governed by subsection 1, 1-A or 1-B,
except for those determined by ranked-choice voting, the person who receives a plurality
of the votes cast for election to any office, as long as there is at least one vote cast for that
office, is elected to that office, except that a write-in candidate must also comply with
section 722‑A.
Sec. 38. 21-A MRSA §723-A, sub-§1, ¶J, as amended by PL 2019, c. 320, §11,
is further amended to read:
J. "Round" means an instance of the sequence of vote counting steps established in
subsection 2 or 2-A and in rules adopted by the Secretary of State.
Sec. 39. 21-A MRSA §723-A, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 628, §2, is
further amended to read:
2. Procedures in election that is not open primary election. Except as provided in
subsections 3, 4 and 7, the following procedures are used to determine the winner of an
election determined by ranked-choice voting that is not an open primary election for the
office of Governor, State Senator or State Representative. The ranked‑choice voting count
must proceed in rounds. In each round, the number of votes for each continuing candidate
must be counted. Each continuing ballot counts as one vote for its highest-ranked
continuing candidate for that round. Exhausted ballots are not counted for any continuing
candidate. The round then ends with one of the following 2 potential outcomes.
A. If there are 2 or fewer continuing candidates, the candidate with the most votes is
declared the winner of the election.
B. If there are more than 2 continuing candidates, the last-place candidate is removed
from consideration and a new round begins.
Sec. 40. 21-A MRSA §723-A, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Procedures in open primary election. Except as provided in subsections 3-A
and 4, the following procedures are used to determine the top 2 candidates in an open
Page 11 - 132LR1234(01)

413 primary election for the office of Governor, State Senator or State Representative
424 determined by ranked-choice voting and the top 4 candidates in an open primary election
435 for the office of United States Senator or United States Representative to Congress. The
446 ranked-choice voting count must proceed in rounds. In each round, the number of votes
457 for each continuing candidate must be counted. Each continuing ballot counts as one vote
468 for its highest-ranked continuing candidate for that round. Exhausted ballots are not
479 counted for any continuing candidate.
A. For determining the candidates for the office of Governor, State Senator or State
Representative, the round then ends with one of the following 2 potential outcomes.
(1) If there are 3 or fewer continuing candidates, the 2 candidates with the most
votes are declared the winners of the open primary election.
(2) If there are more than 3 continuing candidates, the last-place candidate is
defeated and a new round begins.
B. For determining the candidates for the office of United States Senator or United
States Representative to Congress, the round then ends with one of the following 2
potential outcomes.
(1) If there are 5 or fewer continuing candidates, the 4 candidates with the most
votes are declared the winners of the open primary election.
(2) If there are more than 5 continuing candidates, the last place candidate is
defeated and a new round begins.
Sec. 41. 21-A MRSA §723-A, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2023, c. 628, §3, is
further amended to read:
3. Ties in election that is not open primary election. A tie under this section between
last-place candidates in an election determined by ranked-choice voting that is not an open
primary election for the office of Governor, State Senator or State Representative in any
round other than the final round must be decided by lot, and the candidate chosen by lot is
removed from consideration. The result of the tie resolution must be recorded and reused
in the event of a recount. A tie between candidates for the most votes in the final round
must be decided as provided in section 732.
Sec. 42. 21-A MRSA §723-A, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. Ties in open primary election. A tie between the 2nd-place and 3rd-place
candidates for the office of Governor, State Senator or State Representative in an open
primary election in any round must be decided by lot, and the candidate chosen by lot is
defeated. The result of the tie resolution must be recorded and reused in the event of a
recount. A tie between the top 2 candidates for the office of Governor, State Senator or
State Representative in the final round of an open primary election need not be resolved.
A tie between the 4th-place and 5th-place candidates for the office of United States Senator
or United States Representative to Congress in an open primary election in any round must
be decided by lot, and the candidate chosen by lot is defeated. The result of the tie
resolution must be recorded and reused in the event of a recount. A tie between the top 4
candidates for the office of United States Senator or United States Representative to
Congress in the final round of an open primary election need not be resolved.
Page 12 - 132LR1234(01)

Sec. 43. 21-A MRSA §723-A, sub-§5-B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 304, Pt. A,
§18 and affected by §39, is further amended to read:
5-B. Presidential primary elections; selection of delegates. Notwithstanding any
provision of this section to the contrary, for presidential primary elections, tabulation must
continue until only 2 continuing candidates remain or until all remaining candidates meet
or exceed a percentage threshold established by party rule, separate tabulations must be
conducted statewide and for each congressional district and selection and allocation of
delegates to a party's national presidential nominating convention must be in accordance
with any reasonable procedures established at the state party convention, except that
unenrolled voters who participate in the party's primary election must be considered
members of the party for purposes of allocating delegates.
Sec. 44. 21-A MRSA §732, sub-§1, as corrected by RR 2019, c. 2, Pt. B, §58, is
amended to read:
1. Primary election. In a primary election other than an open primary election for the
office of Governor, State Senator or State Representative, the Secretary of State shall notify
each person involved in the tie to be present at the Secretary of State's office at a certain
time. At that time, the Secretary of State shall select the nominee publicly by lot.
Sec. 45. 21-A MRSA §759, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2007, c. 455, §43, is further
amended to read:
4. Warden to check absentee ballot for correct party or district. At a primary
election other than an open primary election when the warden removes a ballot from its
envelope, the warden shall check its color to be sure it is the ballot of the party in which
the voter is enrolled. If it is not, the warden shall immediately replace it in its envelope,
reseal the envelope and write "Rejected" on it, the reason why and the warden's initials. At
a primary or general election, in a municipality that has more than one voting district, when
the warden removes a ballot from its envelope, the warden shall check its color to be sure
it is the ballot of the district in which the voter is registered. If it is not, the warden shall
challenge the ballot according to section 673.
Sec. 46. 21-A MRSA §812, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 1985, c. 161, §6, is amended
to read:
3. Write-in vote. It Except for a general election in an election subject to an open
primary, it must permit a voter to vote for a write-in candidate.
Sec. 47. 21-A MRSA §812, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 1985, c. 161, §6, is amended
to read:
5. Voting restricted at primary. It must prevent a voter from voting for the
nomination of candidates of more than one party at a primary election other than an open
primary election.
Sec. 48. 21-A MRSA §825, sub-§1, as corrected by RR 2019, c. 2, Pt. B, §67, is
amended to read:
1. Primary election. In a primary election other than an open primary election, the
warden or, in the warden's absence, a designated election clerk must activate each voting
machine so that a voter can vote only for the candidates of the political party in which the
voter is enrolled.
Page 13 - 132LR1234(01)

Sec. 49. 21-A MRSA §843, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 1985, c. 161, §6, is amended
to read:
3. Write-in vote. It Except for a general election in an election subject to an open
primary, it must permit a voter to vote for a write-in candidate.
Sec. 50. 21-A MRSA §843, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 1985, c. 161, §6, is amended
to read:
4. Voting restricted at primary. It must prevent a voter from voting for the
nomination of candidates of more than one party at a primary election other than an open
primary election.